Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 3 Division of Real Estate

33-3-1.
Power of probate court — Application for division.

After payment of the debts, charges, and expenses of settling the estate of any person dying intestate, the probate court which granted administration on the estate may divide the real estate of which such intestate died seised, among the parties entitled thereto, in the proportion by law prescribed, whenever application in writing shall be made to it for such purpose by all the parties setting forth and particularly describing each parcel of the real estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 942; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-1

.

33-3-2.
Time of proceeding — Notice.

Upon the filing of such application a time shall be appointed for proceeding therein, and notice thereof shall be given, in such manner as the probate court shall appoint, to the parties in interest.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 943; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-3

-2.

33-3-3.
Decree determining parties entitled — Appointment of commissioners.

At the time appointed, the court shall by decree determine who are the parties entitled to a share of the intestate’s estate, the amount of advancement made by the intestate to any of the parties, and the share to which each of the parties is entitled out of the real estate; and shall thereupon appoint three (3) discreet and disinterested persons, residing in any of the towns wherein the lands to be divided lie, as commissioners to make partition thereof according to the decree.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 944; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-3

.

33-3-4.
Directions as to advancements.

If any child or grandchild of an intestate shall have received from him or her any real or personal estate for his or her advancement, the probate court shall ascertain the amount thereof before appointing commissioners to divide the real estate, and shall, in its decree of division, direct the commissioners to deduct the amount thereof from the share of the child or grandchild.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 954; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-4

.

33-3-5.
Warrants to commissioners.

The court shall issue its warrants to the commissioners, which shall be in substance as follows:

THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND. SC. To of in the county of Greeting: Whereas the probate court of the town of at its session on the day of did pass the following decree, to wit: [Here insert a copy of the decree.] You are therefore hereby authorized, after being engaged to the faithful discharge of the trust reposed in you, to appraise all the real estate described and referred to in the decree, each parcel by itself, at the present value thereof in money, and, after having made such appraisement, to divide the real estate among the parties named in the decree in the proportions set forth therein. You are to let all persons named in the decree have notice when you proceed to make such appraisement and division, and, having completed the same, you are to make return of this warrant, with your doings thereon, unto this probate court as soon as may be. Signed for and in behalf of the probate court on this day of , Clerk.

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 945; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-5

.

33-3-6.
Division of property by commissioners.

The commissioners shall proceed, as soon as may be after receiving their warrant, to execute the duties required of them by virtue thereof and divide the real estate in the manner and proportions prescribed in the decree recited in the warrant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 946; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-6

.

33-3-7.
Assignment of shares by lot or agreement.

If the share of any of the parties shall be less than the share of each of the other parties, and the shares of those other parties be equal, in such case the commissioners shall set off the smaller share to such party and assign the other shares by lot; and the assignment shall also be by lot if all the shares be equal; provided, that if all the parties be sui juris the assignment may be made by agreement among themselves.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 947; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-7

.

33-3-8.
Commissioners’ report.

The commissioners shall make report of all their proceedings under the warrant to the probate court that appointed them; which report shall be passed upon by the court after notice, and, if finally established, shall be recorded in the records of land evidence in the several towns or cities wherein any of the lands lie.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 948; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-8

.

33-3-9.
Representation of infants and persons non compos mentis.

In case any infant or person non compos mentis shall be interested in the partition of any estate as provided in §

33-3-3

, the application for the same shall be made and signed by his or her guardian, if he or she has one, otherwise by his or her guardian ad litem appointed by the court, whose acts in the premises shall be conclusive on such infant or person non compos mentis.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 949; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-9

.

33-3-10.
Real estate not disposed of by will.

Whenever any person shall die leaving a last will and testament duly executed, and shall at the time of his or her decease be seised of any real estate not disposed of by the will, the estate shall be divided among the heirs at law of the deceased in the same manner as though he or she had left no will.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 950; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-10

.

33-3-11.
Division of real estate devised in common.

Real estate held in common by devise may be divided, according to the respective rights of the parties entitled to such real estate, in the manner and form prescribed in this chapter for the division of intestate estates, and the like proceedings shall be had for effecting and confirming the same; provided, that the interest of surviving spouse shall be subject to distribution in accordance with §§

33-25-1

—

33-25-6

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 951; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-11

.

33-3-12.
Division of remainder in property.

Any part of the real estate of any testator or intestate as shall be assigned to his widow pursuant to §

33-1-6

shall, after her death, be divided among the devisees, or heirs at law, of the deceased, in the same manner as the real estate would have been divided in case it had not been assigned pursuant to §

33-1-6

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 952; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-12

; P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 23.

33-3-13.
Payment of expenses of division on appeal to superior court.

Whenever partition or division shall be made by any probate court, and there shall be an appeal to the superior court, and any one or more of the interested parties shall neglect or refuse to pay their just proportion of the expense of such division, the probate court which ordered such division may issue a warrant of distress against such delinquent; provided, that an account of such expense be first laid before such probate court, and the just proportions of the persons interested be settled and allowed, they having been duly notified to be present at such settlement and allowance.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 953; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

33-3-13

.

33-3-14.
Certificate of descent.

Prior to acceptance by the probate court of the final account or affidavit of complete administration, the fiduciary shall submit to the probate court an affidavit of no real property or a duly recorded certificate of descent which shall contain the name and place of residence of each person to whom the real property, or any portion thereof or interest therein is distributed, set out, or divided or descends, or a particular description of the estate, portion, or interest distributed, set out, or divided or descending to each person. Said certificate of descent shall be signed by the fiduciary.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 589, § 1.